Colorado, session 2026A, SB154.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-49.9-101, amend
(3)(b)(III), (3)(b)(IV), (3)(b)(V), (3)(b)(VI), (3)(c)(II), and (3)(c)(III)(A) as
follows:
24-49.9-101. Colorado channel authority - creation - legislative
declaration.
(3) (b) The board consists of the following nine members:
(III) One member serving in the house of representatives, appointed
by the speaker of the house of representatives;
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(IV) One member serving in the house of representatives, appointed
by the minority leader of the house of representatives;
(V) One member serving in the senate, appointed by the president
of the senate;
(VI) One member serving in the senate, appointed by the minority
leader of the senate; and
(c) (II) Members of the board appointed under subsection (3)(b)(III),
(3)(b)(IV), (3)(b)(V), or (3)(b)(VI) of this section serve for terms of four
years so long as they also serve as members of the house of the general
assembly from which they are appointed. Other members of the board serve
for terms of four years; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no
more than three members' terms expire in the same year.
(III) (A) A vacancy in the members of the board appointed under
subparagraph (III), (IV), (V), or (VI) of paragraph (b) of this subsection (3)
SUBSECTION (3)(b)(III), (3)(b)(IV), (3)(b)(V), OR (3)(b)(VI) OF THIS SECTION
shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment, but for the
remainder of the unexpired term only. except that these members must at all
times consist of a member from each major political party in each house of
the general assembly and be appointed by the appropriate appointing
authority under subparagraph (III), (IV), (V), or (VI) of paragraph (b) of
this subsection (3), as appropriate, to ensure that a member from each major
political party in each house is a member of the board.
SECTION 2. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 long bill.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, to implement this
act, the general fund appropriation made in House Bill 26-1333 for the
2026-27 state fiscal year to the legislative department for use by the general
assembly is decreased by $1,446.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not require a reduction of an
appropriation in House Bill 26-1333 for the 2026-27 state fiscal year if:
(a) The amount of the general fund appropriation made in House
Bill 26-1333 for the 2026-27 state fiscal year for the general assembly is
less than the amount of the adjustment required in subsection (1) of this
section; or
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-154

(b) House Bill 26-1333 for the 2026-27 state fiscal year does not
include an appropriation to the legislative department for use by the general
assembly.
SECTION 3. Effective date. This act takes effect upon passage;
except that section 2 of this act takes effect only if House Bill 26-1333 for
the 2026-27 state fiscal year becomes law, in which case section 2 takes
effect upon the effective date of this act or of House Bill 26-1333,
whichever is later.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-154

preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-154